Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.126

Private applicator, limited private applicator, or rancher private applicator—Requirements—Application for license—Fees.

It is unlawful for any person to act as a private applicator, limited private applicator, or rancher private applicator without first complying with requirements determined by the director as necessary to prevent unreasonable adverse effects on the environment, including injury to the pesticide applicator or other persons, for each specific pesticide use.

(1) Certification standards to determine the individual's competency with respect to the use and handling of the pesticide or class of pesticides for which the private applicator, limited private applicator, or rancher private applicator is certified must be relative to hazards of the particular type of application, class of pesticides, or handling procedure. In determining these standards the director must take into consideration standards of the EPA and is authorized to adopt these standards by rule.

(2) Application for a private applicator license must be accompanied by a fee of thirty-eight dollars. Application for a limited private applicator license must be accompanied by a fee of thirty-three dollars. Application for a rancher private applicator license must be accompanied by a fee of one hundred three dollars. Individuals with a valid certified applicator license, pest control consultant license, or dealer manager license who qualify in the appropriate statewide or agricultural license categories are exempt from the private applicator, limited private applicator, or rancher private applicator fee requirements. However, licensed public pesticide operators, otherwise exempted from the public pesticide operator license fee requirement, are not also exempted from the fee requirements under this subsection.

[ 2021 c 244 s 11; 2008 c 285 s 24; 2004 c 100 s 2; 1997 c 242 s 14; 1994 c 283 s 12; 1993 sp.s. c 19 s 7; 1992 c 170 s 7; 1991 c 109 s 33; 1989 c 380 s 42; 1979 c 92 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Effective date—2008 c 285 ss 15-26: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Intent—Captions not law—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Effective date—2004 c 100: See note following RCW 17.21.020.

Effective date—1997 c 242: See note following RCW 15.58.070.